Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 2 School Committees and Superintendents
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-2-1.
Cities included as towns.

Wherever the word “town” is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to mean “city or town.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-1

.

16-2-2.
City and town schools required — School year — Location — Kindergartens.

Except as specifically provided in this section, every city or town shall establish and maintain for at least one hundred eighty (180) days annually or the equivalent thereof, exclusive of holidays, a sufficient number of schools in convenient places under the control and management of the school committee and under the supervision of the Rhode Island Board of Education. In lieu of a convenient location, the school committee may provide transportation for pupils to and from school in accordance with the provisions of chapter 21 of this title. Provided, that a school district may establish a school year that is the equivalent of one hundred eighty (180) days through the use of longer school days in terms of hours or pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, and that may total less than one hundred eighty (180) separate days, so long as through the use of the longer school day, the school district annually provides a minimum of one thousand eighty (1,080) school hours in a single school year. This figure is based on a minimum of six (6) hours per school day. For purposes of clarification, the intent herein is to permit school districts to amend their school year to provide for longer school days while reducing the actual number of days in which the school facilities must be fully staffed and maintained, but to insure that in doing so, school districts shall still provide the minimum amount of instruction time contemplated by this section. Nothing herein shall be deemed to limit a school district from exceeding the minimum amounts of days and hours set forth herein.

School districts intending to make use of the option provided herein to lengthen school days and shorten the school year shall submit a detailed school day plan and a proposed school calendar to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education for approval. The commissioner shall review the submitted school day plan and the submitted calendar to determine whether the plan and calendar are academically sound and fiscally efficient. The commissioner may grant or deny approval of the plan and/or the calendar.

School facilities shall include a sufficient number of kindergartens.

On or before December 1, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary education shall establish a policy that allows a school district to submit a detailed plan, at any time, to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education that would allow the schools to conduct instruction through virtual education when the schools have been closed due to inclement weather or other emergency. The plan for virtual education would be subject to, and require approval by, the council on elementary and secondary education in order to count as a school day.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1097, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 970, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3642, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-2

; P.L. 1967, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 26; P.L. 2013, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 264, § 1.

16-2-3.
Emergency reduction of school year.

In the event of any emergency brought about by the incidence of any epidemic or the threat of an epidemic or any emergency which may endanger the health of children or the physical well being of the community, the school committee of any city or town with the approval of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education may reduce the number of school days to not less than one hundred seventy (170) days; provided, that the compensation of teachers, janitors, clerks, and other employees in the public schools of the city or town shall not be reduced by reason of the shortening of the school year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3642, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-3

.

16-2-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 69, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-4

; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 12, effective August 9, 1996.

16-2-5.
Composition of city or town school committees — Election and terms of members — Vacancies.

The school committee of each city or town shall consist of three (3) residents of the city or town, or of any number as at the present time constitute the committee. In cities or towns having annual elections of city or town officers the committee shall be divided as equally as may be into three (3) classes whose several terms of office shall expire at the end of three (3) years from the dates of their respective elections. In cities or towns having biennial elections the committee shall be divided as equally as may be into two (2) classes whose several terms of office shall expire at the end of four (4) years from the dates of their respective elections. As the office of each class shall become vacant, the vacancy or vacancies shall be filled by the city or town at its regular city or town meeting for the election of state or city or town officers, or by the city or town council at its next meeting after this. In case of a vacancy by death, resignation, or otherwise than as is provided in this section, the vacancy shall be filled by the city or town council until the next regular city or town meeting for the election of state or city or town officers, when it shall be filled for the unexpired term as is provided in this section. This section shall not apply to the cities of Providence, Central Falls, Woonsocket, or the Town of North Smithfield.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 69, § 4; P.L. 1925, ch. 680, § 16; P.L. 1926, ch. 889, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-5

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 71; P.L. 2015, ch. 1, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 4, § 3.

16-2-5.1.
Professional development.

The Rhode Island College in cooperation with the Rhode Island association of school committees shall develop a professional development educational program for Rhode Island school committees, that will include instruction in labor and labor relations, negotiating collective bargaining agreements, employee contract analysis, school finance, school law; duties and responsibilities of the committee, duties and responsibilities of the superintendent, ethics, the requirements of the open meetings law, student achievement, strategic planning, educational standards, student assessment, school accountability, data interpretation and analysis, collaboration building, advocacy, annual performance evaluation of the school superintendent and the local school committee, and any other topics as the Rhode Island association of school committees may deem to be necessary.

In conformity with § 16-60-4(15), the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall approve the professional development program and create a process for recognizing school committee members that successfully complete the program in part or in whole.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 476, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 335, § 1.

16-2-6.
Chairperson and clerk of city or town committee.

The school committee of each city or town shall choose a chairperson and clerk, either of whom may sign any orders or official papers, and may be removed at the pleasure of the committee. The clerk, under the direction of the committee, shall keep a journal of the proceedings of the committee.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-6

.

16-2-7.
Distribution of documents and blanks by clerk.

The clerk of the school committee, when required by the department of elementary and secondary education, shall distribute any school documents and blanks as shall be sent to the clerk to the persons for whom they are intended.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 14; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-7

.

16-2-8.
Regular meetings of committee.

The school committee of each city or town shall hold at least four (4) regular meetings in every year, at a time and place within the city or town as the committee shall by general order fix and determine.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-8

.

16-2-9.
General powers and duties of school committees. [Effective until January 1, 2023.]

Unless the responsibility is otherwise delegated by this chapter, the entire care, control, and management of all public school interests of the several cities and towns shall be vested in the school committees of the several cities and towns. School committees shall have, in addition to those enumerated in this title, the following powers and duties:

To identify educational needs in the community.

To develop education policies to meet the needs of the community.

To provide for and ensure the implementation of federal and state laws, the regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education, and local school policies, programs, and directives.

To provide for the evaluation of the performance of the school system.

To have responsibility for the care and control of local schools.

To have overall policy responsibility for the employment and discipline of school department personnel.

To approve a master plan defining goals and objectives of the school system. These goals and objectives shall be expressed in terms of what men and women should know and be able to do as a result of their educational experience. The committee shall periodically evaluate the efforts and results of education in light of these objectives.

To provide for the location, care, control, and management of school facilities and equipment.

To adopt a school budget to submit to the local appropriating authority.

To adopt any changes in the school budget during the course of the school year.

To approve expenditures in the absence of a budget, consistent with state law.

To employ a superintendent of schools and assign any compensation and other terms and conditions as the school committee and superintendent shall agree, provided that in no event shall the term of employment of the superintendent exceed three (3) years. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as invalidating or impairing a contract of a school committee with a school superintendent in force on May 12, 1978.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 2 and P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 2.]

To establish minimum standards for personnel, to adopt personnel policies, and to approve a table of organization.

To establish standards for the evaluation of personnel.

To establish standards for conduct in the schools and for disciplinary actions.

To hear appeals from disciplinary actions.

To enter into contracts; provided, however, that notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws, whether of specific or general application, and notwithstanding the provisions of any charter of any municipality where the school committee is appointed and not elected, but not including, the Central Falls school district board of trustees established by §

16-2-34

, the power and duty to enter into collective bargaining agreements shall be vested in the chief executive officer of the municipality and not in the school committee.

To publish policy manuals that shall include all school committee policies.

To establish policies governing curriculum, courses of instruction, and text books.

To provide for transportation services that meet or exceed standards of the council on elementary and secondary education.

To make any reports to the department of education as are required by the council on elementary and secondary education.

To delegate, consistent with law, any responsibilities to the superintendent as the committee may deem appropriate.

To address the health and wellness of students and employees.

To establish a subcommittee of the school board or committee to decrease obesity and address school health and wellness policies for students and employees consistent with §

16-21-28

.

To annually undertake a minimum of six (6) hours of professional development as set forth and described in §

16-2-5.1

.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28 or to allow any school committee to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

The elected school committees of each city, town, or regional school district, or the chief executive officer of any municipality having an appointed school committee, shall have the power to bind their successors and successor committees by entering into contracts of employment in the exercise of their governmental functions.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, the requirement defined in subsections (d) through (f) of this section shall apply. The school committee of each school district shall be responsible for maintaining a school budget that does not result in a debt.

The school committee shall, within thirty (30) days after the close of the first and second quarters of the state’s fiscal year, adopt a budget as may be necessary to enable it to operate without incurring a debt, as described in subsection (d).

In the event that any obligation, encumbrance, or expenditure by a superintendent of schools or a school committee is in excess of the amount budgeted or that any revenue is less than the amount budgeted, the school committee shall within five (5) working days of its discovery of potential or actual over expenditure or revenue deficiency submit a written statement of the amount of and cause for the over obligation or over expenditure or revenue deficiency to the city or town council president and any other person who by local charter or statute serves as the city or town’s executive officer; the statement shall further include a statement of the school committee’s plan for corrective actions necessary to meet the requirements of subsection (d). The plan shall be approved by the auditor general and also submitted to the division of municipal finance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whether of general or specific application, and notwithstanding any contrary provision of any city or town charter or ordinance, the elected school committee of any city, town, and regional school district shall be, and is hereby authorized to retain, the services of independent legal counsel as it may deem necessary and convenient. Any counsel so retained shall be compensated out of funds duly appropriated to the school committee, and in no event shall the independent counsel be deemed to be an employee of the pertinent city or town for any purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 8; P.L. 1902, ch. 989, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 5; P.L. 1913, ch. 946, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-9

; P.L. 1978, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 44, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 303, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 12, § 18; P.L. 2011, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 2.

16-2-9.
General powers and duties of school committees. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Unless the responsibility is otherwise delegated by this chapter, the entire care, control, and management of all public school interests of the several cities and towns shall be vested in the school committees of the several cities and towns. School committees shall have, in addition to those enumerated in this title, the following powers and duties:

To identify educational needs in the community.

To develop education policies to meet the needs of the community.

To provide for and ensure the implementation of federal and state laws, the regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education, and local school policies, programs, and directives.

To provide for the evaluation of the performance of the school system.

To have responsibility for the care and control of local schools.

To have overall policy responsibility for the employment and discipline of school department personnel.

To approve a master plan defining goals and objectives of the school system. These goals and objectives shall be expressed in terms of what men and women should know and be able to do as a result of their educational experience. The committee shall periodically evaluate the efforts and results of education in light of these objectives.

To provide for the location, care, control, and management of school facilities and equipment.

To adopt a school budget to submit to the local appropriating authority.

To adopt any changes in the school budget during the course of the school year.

To approve expenditures in the absence of a budget, consistent with state law.

To employ a superintendent of schools and assign any compensation and other terms and conditions as the school committee and superintendent shall agree, provided that in no event shall the term of employment of the superintendent exceed three (3) years. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as invalidating or impairing a contract of a school committee with a school superintendent in force on May 12, 1978.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 2 and P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 2.]

To establish minimum standards for personnel, to adopt personnel policies, and to approve a table of organization.

To establish standards for the evaluation of personnel.

To establish standards for conduct in the schools and for disciplinary actions.

To hear appeals from disciplinary actions.

To enter into contracts; provided, however, that notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws, whether of specific or general application, and notwithstanding the provisions of any charter of any municipality where the school committee is appointed and not elected, but not including, the Central Falls school district board of trustees established by §

16-2-34

, the power and duty to enter into collective bargaining agreements shall be vested in the chief executive officer of the municipality and not in the school committee.

To publish policy manuals that shall include all school committee policies.

To establish policies governing curriculum, courses of instruction, and text books.

To provide for transportation services that meet or exceed standards of the council on elementary and secondary education.

To make any reports to the department of education as are required by the council on elementary and secondary education.

To delegate, consistent with law, any responsibilities to the superintendent as the committee may deem appropriate.

To address the health and wellness of students and employees.

To establish a subcommittee of the school board or committee to decrease obesity and address school health and wellness policies for students and employees consistent with §

16-21-28

.

To annually undertake a minimum of six (6) hours of professional development as set forth and described in §

16-2-5.1

.

To establish policies governing the implementation of the incorporation of career and technical education programs into the kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) curricula that include knowledge of careers and all types of employment opportunities, including, but not limited to, registered apprenticeships in accordance with chapter 45 of title 28, and emphasizing the advantages of completing school with marketable skills.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28 or to allow any school committee to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

The elected school committees of each city, town, or regional school district, or the chief executive officer of any municipality having an appointed school committee, shall have the power to bind their successors and successor committees by entering into contracts of employment in the exercise of their governmental functions.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, the requirement defined in subsections (d) through (f) of this section shall apply. The school committee of each school district shall be responsible for maintaining a school budget that does not result in a debt.

The school committee shall, within thirty (30) days after the close of the first and second quarters of the state’s fiscal year, adopt a budget as may be necessary to enable it to operate without incurring a debt, as described in subsection (d).

In the event that any obligation, encumbrance, or expenditure by a superintendent of schools or a school committee is in excess of the amount budgeted or that any revenue is less than the amount budgeted, the school committee shall within five (5) working days of its discovery of potential or actual over expenditure or revenue deficiency submit a written statement of the amount of and cause for the over obligation or over expenditure or revenue deficiency to the city or town council president and any other person who by local charter or statute serves as the city or town’s executive officer; the statement shall further include a statement of the school committee’s plan for corrective actions necessary to meet the requirements of subsection (d). The plan shall be approved by the auditor general and also submitted to the division of municipal finance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whether of general or specific application, and notwithstanding any contrary provision of any city or town charter or ordinance, the elected school committee of any city, town, and regional school district shall be, and is hereby authorized to retain, the services of independent legal counsel as it may deem necessary and convenient. Any counsel so retained shall be compensated out of funds duly appropriated to the school committee, and in no event shall the independent counsel be deemed to be an employee of the pertinent city or town for any purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 8; P.L. 1902, ch. 989, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 5; P.L. 1913, ch. 946, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-9

; P.L. 1978, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 44, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 303, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 12, § 18; P.L. 2011, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 346, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 347, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

16-2-9.1.
Code of basic management principles and ethical school standards.

School committees shall adopt the following code of basic management principles and ethical school standards:

The
(District)
does hereby establish a code of basic principles and ethical standards for school committee members acting individually and collectively as boards of education in the management of the public schools of
(City or Town)
.

The school committee in
accepts the obligation to operate the public schools in accordance with the fundamental principles and standards of school management, which principles include but are not limited to the following:

Formulate written policy for the administration of schools to be reviewed regularly and revised as necessary.

Exercise legislative, policy-making, planning and appraising functions and delegate administrative functions in the operation of schools.

Recognize their critical responsibility for selecting the superintendent, defining his or her responsibilities, and evaluating his or her performance regularly without directly engaging in administrative processes.

Accept and encourage a variety of opinions from and communication with all parts of the community.

Make public relevant institutional information in order to promote communication and understanding between the school system and the community.

Act on legislative and policy-making matters only after examining pertinent facts and considering the superintendent’s recommendations.

Conduct meetings with planned and published agendas.

Encourage and promote professional growth of school staff so that quality of instruction and support services may continually be improved.

Establish and maintain procedural steps for resolving complaints and criticisms of school affairs.

Act only through public meetings since individual board members have no authority to bind the board.

Recognize that the first and greatest concern must be the educational welfare of the students attending the public schools.

Work with other committee members to establish effective board policies and to delegate authority for the administration of the schools to the superintendent.

Avoid being placed in a position of conflict of interest, and refrain from using the committee position for personal gain.

Attend all regularly scheduled committee meetings as possible, and become informed concerning the issues to be considered at those meetings.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28 or to allow any school committee or superintendent to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 642, § 2.

16-2-9.2.
Joint purchasing agreements.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule, any two (2) or more school committees may establish joint purchasing agreements between and among themselves or with the Rhode Island Association of School Committees for the purpose of purchasing goods and services. The Rhode Island Association of School Committees, acting on behalf of any school committees that are members of a joint purchasing agreement may seek the services of the Rhode Island division of purchases, department of administration, in procuring items necessary to the operation of the school district(s) and which items are common in usage to those procured by the state, and the division of purchasers shall, upon request by the Rhode Island Association of School Committees, furnish to its lists of supplies and equipment. The Rhode Island Association of School Committees and any consortia created pursuant to a joint purchase agreement under this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights and benefits set forth in §

37-2-56

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 355, § 1.

16-2-9.3.
The advisory council on school finances.

The legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a need for an advisory council on school finances to strengthen the fiscal accountability of school districts, regional school districts, state schools and charter schools in Rhode Island. The council shall be composed of five (5) members as follows:

The auditor general of the state of Rhode Island or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Rhode Island association of school committees or his or her designee;

The president of the Rhode Island association of school business officials or his or her designee;

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education or his or her designee; and

The director of the department of administration or his or her designee. The auditor general or his or her designee shall serve as chair of the council. By July 1, 2005, the council shall develop recommendations for a uniform system of accounting, including a chart of accounts for all school districts, regional school districts, state schools and charter schools. By July 1, 2009 the council shall develop recommendations for a uniform system of accounting for all educational regional collaboratives identified in chapter 16-3.1. Said recommendations shall be advisory in nature and may be adopted by the office of auditor general and the department of elementary and secondary education in part or in whole.

The council shall meet no less than annually and recommend changes in accounting procedures to be adopted by school districts, regional school districts, state schools and charter schools as well as apprise school business officials, charter school officials, school committees and school superintendents, school administrators and state school officials about professional development opportunities that promotes sound fiscal practices and a knowledge of current state and federal rules and regulations regarding school finance. The council shall also report, annually, its activities and recommendations to the house committee on education accountability, the senate committee on education and the office of the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 8; P.L. 2008, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 14.

16-2-9.4.
School district accounting compliance.

The office of auditor general and the department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate a uniform system of accounting, including a chart of accounts based on the recommendations of the advisory council on school finances, and require all accounts of the school districts, regional school districts, state schools, and charter schools to be kept in accordance therewith; provided, that in any case in which the uniform system of accounting is not practicable, the office of auditor general, in conjunction with the department of elementary and secondary education, shall determine the manner in which the accounts shall be kept. The uniform chart of accounts (UCOA) must allow for both school-to-school and school district-to-school district comparisons. The structure of the UCOA shall ensure that data is captured and presented by, at a minimum, position, program, and school location in order to facilitate such comparisons. The uniform system of accounting shall also include a standardized budget process to ensure districts can annually assess investment priorities and incorporate long-range planning.

For the purpose of securing a uniform system of accounting and a chart of accounts the advisory council on school finances, as defined in §

16-2-9.3

, may make such surveys of the operation of any school district, regional school district, state school, or charter school as they shall deem necessary.

Upon completion of the implementation of the uniform chart of accounts, all the school districts, regional school districts, state schools, and/or charter schools, shall implement a department of elementary and secondary education-approved budget model that shall include a distinct line item for payments to charter schools and use best practices established by the department of elementary and secondary education for long-range planning, budget development, and budget administration and reporting.

Commencing July 1, 2017, and on a continuing basis thereafter, each local education agency shall submit a “budget-only” file that conforms with UCOA requirements to the department of elementary and secondary education within 30 days of the city/town adoption of the budget.

Using data from the uniform chart of accounts, on an annual basis, the department of elementary and secondary education shall publish on its website, and provide the general assembly with, a performance dashboard indicating the per-pupil expenditures of each public school and school district broken down by revenue sources and expenditure categories. Further, the department shall provide, within the same dashboard, student-performance indicators for each public school and school district.

Commencing July 1, 2017, and on a continuing basis thereafter, each local education agency shall post the following information on its website, in a downloadable format, for free public access:

The local education agency’s annual budget, commencing with the budget for the 2017-18 budget year, that includes, at a minimum, information at the program and school levels;

The local education agency shall post a link to the statewide website operated by the department of elementary and secondary education that will publish the school- and district-level “budget only” and UCOA expenditure data.

Each local education agency shall update the information specified in subdivision (f)(1) within sixty (60) days after adoption and/or making any changes to the local education agency’s budget, including any changes made to the budgets of an individual program or school.

If any school district, regional school district, state school, or charter school fails to install and maintain the uniform system of accounting, including a chart of accounts and approved budget model, or fails to keep its accounts and interdepartmental records, or refuses or neglects to make the reports and to furnish the information in accordance with the method prescribed by the office of auditor general and the department of education, or hinders or prevents the examination of accounts and financial records, the auditor general and the commissioner of education, and/or their respective designee(s), shall make a report to the superintendent of schools of the local education agency, the school committee chairperson, the mayor or town manager, and the president of the town council, and/or for a charter school, to the board of trustees or directors, as applicable, in writing, specifying the nature and extent of the failure, refusal, neglect, hindrance, or prevention, and the commissioner is hereby authorized and directed to review the matter so reported. If the commissioner shall find that failure, refusal, neglect, hindrance, or prevention exists and that the school district, regional school district, state school, or charter school should properly comply in the matter so reported, the commissioner shall direct the school district, regional school district, state school, or charter school, in writing, to so comply. If the failure, refusal, neglect, hindrance, or prevention shall continue for a period of ten (10) days following the written direction, the commissioner may request the board of education for approval to withhold distribution of state aid to said school district, regional school district, state school, or charter school. The board shall hold a hearing and provide the subject school and/or district notice and an opportunity to be heard at said hearing. After hearing thereon, the board may authorize the commissioner to withhold the distribution of state aid to said school district, regional school district, state school, or charter school, if the board determines such sanction is appropriate.

The department of elementary and secondary education, in consultation with the division of municipal finance, shall conduct periodic reviews and analysis of school revenues and expenses. The department shall also review and monitor compliance with the approved budget model and best practices. The department shall identify those local education agencies considered to be at risk of a year-end deficit or a structural deficit that could impact future years. Such potential deficits shall be identified based on the periodic reviews, which may also include on-site visits and reporting in accordance with the provisions of §

45-12-22.2

. Potential deficits shall be reported to the office of municipal finance, office of auditor general, superintendent, chairperson of the school committee, mayor or town manager, and the president of the town council, of the applicable school district, regional school district, or state school, and/or for a charter school, to the board of trustees or directors, as applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 8; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 489, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 1.